test/src/morphology/A-kuldi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - kuldi: # adjectives 199 'eng golden /est kuldne /fin kultainen' - full paradigm
     kuldi+A+Sg+Nom: kuldi
     kuldi+A+Sg+Gen: kuldiz
     kuldi+A+Sg+Par: kuldizt
     kuldi+A+Sg+Dat: kuldizõn
     kuldi+A+Sg+Ins: kuldizõks
     kuldi+A+Sg+Ill: kuldizõ
     kuldi+A+Sg+Ela: kuldizõst
     kuldi+A+Pl+Nom: kuldizt
     kuldi+A+Pl+Gen: kuldizt
     kuldi+A+Pl+Par: kuldiži
     kuldi+A+Pl+Dat: kuldiztõn
     kuldi+A+Pl+Ins: kuldiztõks
     kuldi+A+Pl+Ill: kuldižiz
     kuldi+A+Pl+Ela: kuldižist
